Tennessee, session 114, SB2434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-903(a)(6), is amended by
deleting "subdivision (a)(6)" in subdivisions (a)(6)(B) and (a)(6)(C) and substituting "subdivision
(a)(7)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-903(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision (5) and renumbering the subsequent subdivisions:
(5) Knowingly uses an unmanned aircraft over the grounds of a school;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-903, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b)
(1) An offense under subdivisions (a)(1)-(6) is a Class C misdemeanor.
(2) An offense under subdivision (a)(7) is a Class E felony.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2434
012141
- 1 -